Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-9508
Direct provider; direct service charges; acceptance of payments.

A direct provider may accept payment of direct service charges directly or indirectly from third parties. A direct provider may accept all or part of a direct service charge paid by an employer on behalf of an employee who is a direct patient. A direct provider shall not enter into a contract with an employer relating to direct agreements between the direct provider and employees of that employer other than to establish the timing and method of the payment of the direct service charge by the employer.

Laws 2016, LB817, § 8.